hu: Jármű rendszámtábla méret standard: Ausztrál szabvány (372 x 134 mm); EU szabvány (520 x 110 mm); Japán szabvány (330 x 165 mm); Egyéb / Univerzális; Egyesült Királyság-beli szabvány (520 x 111 mm); USA motorkerékpár (7 x 4 hüvelyk); USA / Kanada szabvány (12 x 6 hüvelyk); Egyéb
ro-RO: Standard de dimensiune pentru plăcuța de înmatriculare auto: Standard Australia (372 x 134 mm); Standard UE (520 x 110 mm); Standard Japonia (330 x 165 mm); Altele / universal; Standard UK (520 x 111 mm); Motociclete SUA (7 x 4 in); Standard SUA/Canada (12 x 6 in); Altele
sl-SI: Standard velikosti registrske tablice vozila: Avstralski standard (372 x 134 mm); EU standard (520 x 110 mm); Japonski standard (330 x 165 mm); Drugo/univerzalno; UK standard (520 x 111 mm); ZDA motorno kolo (7 x 4 palcev); ZDA/Kanada standard (12 x 6 palcev); Drugo
ko: 차량 번호판 크기 표준: 호주 표준(372 x 134mm); EU 표준(520 x 110mm); 일본 표준(330 x 165mm); 기타/공용; 영국 표준(520 x 111mm); 미국 오토바이(7 x 4인치); 미국/캐나다 표준(12 x 6인치); 기타
zh-CN: 车牌尺寸标准: 澳大利亚标准 (372 x 134 mm); 欧盟标准 (520 x 110 mm); 日本标准 (330 x 165 mm); 其他/通用; 英国标准 (520 x 111 mm); 美国摩托车 (7 x 4 英寸); 美国/加拿大标准 (12 x 6 英寸); 其他
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės valstybinio numerio dydžio standartas: Australijos standartas (372 x 134 mm); ES standartas (520 x 110 mm); Japonijos standartas (330 x 165 mm); Kitas / universalus; JK standartas (520 x 111 mm); JAV motociklų standartas (7 x 4 col.); JAV / Kanados standartas (12 x 6 col.); Kita
de: Größenstandard des Fahrzeugkennzeichens: Australien-Standard (372 x 134 mm); EU-Standard (520 x 110 mm); Japan-Standard (330 x 165 mm); Sonstiges/Universal; UK-Standard (520 x 111 mm); USA-Motorrad (7 x 4 Zoll); USA/Kanada-Standard (12 x 6 Zoll); Sonstiges
ru: Стандарт размера номерного знака: Стандарт Австралии (372 x 134 мм); Стандарт ЕС (520 x 110 мм); Стандарт Японии (330 x 165 мм); Другой/универсальный; Стандарт Великобритании (520 x 111 мм); Мотоциклы США (7 x 4 дюйма); Стандарт США/Канады (12 x 6 дюймов); Другое
fi: Ajoneuvon rekisterikilven kokostandardi: Australian standardi (372 × 134 mm); EU-standardi (520 × 110 mm); Japanin standardi (330 × 165 mm); Muu/yleiskäyttöinen; Britannian standardi (520 × 111 mm); Yhdysvaltain moottoripyörä (7 × 4 in); Yhdysvallat/Kanada, standardi (12 × 6 in); Muu
nl: Standaard voor kentekenplaatafmetingen: Australische standaard (372 x 134 mm); EU-standaard (520 x 110 mm); Japanse standaard (330 x 165 mm); Overig/universeel; VK-standaard (520 x 111 mm); VS motorfiets (7 x 4 inch); VS/Canada-standaard (12 x 6 inch); Overig
el: Πρότυπο μεγέθους πινακίδας κυκλοφορίας οχήματος: Πρότυπο Αυστραλίας (372 x 134 mm); Πρότυπο ΕΕ (520 x 110 mm); Πρότυπο Ιαπωνίας (330 x 165 mm); Άλλο/Γενικής χρήσης; Πρότυπο ΗΒ (520 x 111 mm); Μοτοσικλέτας ΗΠΑ (7 x 4 in); Πρότυπο ΗΠΑ/Καναδά (12 x 6 in); Άλλο
sk-SK: Štandardná veľkosť tabuľky s evidenčným číslom vozidla: Austrálsky štandard (372 x 134 mm); Štandard EÚ (520 x 110 mm); Japonský štandard (330 x 165 mm); Iné/univerzálne; Štandard Spojeného kráľovstva (520 x 111 mm); Motocykle USA (7 x 4 in); Štandard USA/Kanada (12 x 6 in); Iné
pt-PT: Norma relativa ao tamanho da placa de matrícula do veículo: Padrão da Austrália (372 x 134 mm); Padrão da UE (520 x 110 mm); Padrão do Japão (330 x 165 mm); Outro/universal; Padrão do Reino Unido (520 x 111 mm); Moto dos EUA (7 x 4 pol.); Padrão dos EUA/Canadá (12 x 6 pol.); Outro
zh-TW: 車牌尺寸標準: 澳洲標準 (372 x 134 公釐); 歐盟標準 (520 x 110 公釐); 日本標準 (330 x 165 公釐); 其他/通用; 英國標準 (520 x 111 公釐); 美國機車標準 (7 x 4 吋); 美加標準 (12 x 6 吋); 其他
nb: Størrelsesstandard for nummerskilt på kjøretøy: Australsk standard (372 x 134 mm); EU-standard (520 x 110 mm); Japansk standard (330 x 165 mm); Annet/universell; Storbritannia-standard (520 x 111 mm); USA motorsykkel (7 x 4 tommer); USA/Canada standard (12 x 6 tommer); Annet
tr: Araç plaka boyut standardı: Avustralya standart (372 x 134 mm); AB standart (520 x 110 mm); Japonya standart (330 x 165 mm); Diğer/Evrensel; Birleşik Krallık standart (520 x 111 mm); ABD motosiklet (7 x 4 inç); ABD/Kanada standart (12 x 6 inç); Diğer
hr-HR: Standard veličine registarske pločice vozila: Australski standard (372 x 134 mm); Standard EU-a (520 x 110 mm); Japanski standard (330 x 165 mm); Ostalo / Univerzalno; Standard Ujedinjenog Kraljevstva (520 x 111 mm); Američki motocikl (7 x 4 in); Standard SAD/Kanada (12 x 6 in); Ostalo
pl: Standard rozmiaru tablicy rejestracyjnej pojazdu: Standard australijski (372 x 134 mm); Standard UE (520 x 110 mm); Standard japoński (330 x 165 mm); Inne/uniwersalne; Standard brytyjski (520 x 111 mm); Motocykl USA (7 x 4 cale); Standard USA/Kanada (12 x 6 cali); Inne
es: Estándar de tamaño de la placa de identificación del vehículo: Estándar de Australia (372 x 134 mm); Estándar de la UE (520 x 110 mm); Estándar de Japón (330 x 165 mm); Otro/universal; Estándar del Reino Unido (520 x 111 mm); Motocicleta de EE. UU. (7 x 4 pulgadas); Estándar de EE. UU./Canadá (12 x 6 pulgadas); Otro
ja: 車両ライセンスプレートサイズ標準: オーストラリア規格 (372 x 134 mm); EU 規格 (520 x 110 mm); 日本規格 (330 x 165 mm); その他/ユニバーサル; UK 規格 (520 x 111 mm); 米国オートバイ (7 x 4 インチ); 米国/カナダ規格 (12 x 6 インチ); その他
bg-BG: Стандартен размер на регистрационен номер на превозно средство: Австралийски стандарт (372 x 134 мм); Стандарт за ЕС (520 x 110 мм); Японски стандарт (330 x 165 мм); Друго/универсално; Стандарт за Обединеното кралство (520 x 111 мм); Мотоциклет САЩ (7 x 4 инча); Стандарт за САЩ/Канада (12 x 6 инча); Друго
da: Størrelsesstandard for nummerplade: Australsk standard (372 x 134 mm); EU-standard (520 x 110 mm); Japansk standard (330 x 165 mm); Andet/universel; Britisk standard (520 x 111 mm); Amerikansk motorcykel (7 x 4 in); Amerikansk/canadisk standard (12 x 6 in); Andet
en: Vehicle license plate size standard: Australia standard (372 x 134 mm); EU standard (520 x 110 mm); Japan standard (330 x 165 mm); Other/Universal; UK standard (520 x 111 mm); US motorcycle (7 x 4 in); US/Canada standard (12 x 6 in); Other
fr: Normes relatives aux dimensions des plaques d'immatriculation: Standard australien (372 x 134 mm); Standard européen (520 x 110 mm); Standard japonais (330 x 165 mm); Autre/universel; Standard britannique (520 x 111 mm); Moto États-Unis (7 x 4 po); Standard États-Unis/Canada (12 x 6 po); Autre
pt-BR: Norma relativa ao tamanho das placas de licença de veículos: Padrão da Austrália (372 x 134 mm); Padrão da UE (520 x 110 mm); Padrão do Japão (330 x 165 mm); Outro/Universal; Padrão do Reino Unido (520 x 111 mm); Motocicleta dos EUA (7 x 4 pol.); Padrão dos EUA/Canadá (12 x 6 pol.); Outro
vi: Tiêu chuẩn kích thước biển số xe: Tiêu chuẩn Úc (372 x 134 mm); Tiêu chuẩn EU (520 x 110 mm); Tiêu chuẩn Nhật Bản (330 x 165 mm); Khác/Phổ thông; Tiêu chuẩn Anh (520 x 111 mm); Xe máy Mỹ (7 x 4 in); Tiêu chuẩn Mỹ/Canada (12 x 6 in); Khác
cs: Standard velikosti SPZ vozidla: Australský standard (372 × 134 mm); Standard EU (520 × 110 mm); Japonský standard (330 × 165 mm); Jiné/univerzální; Standard UK (520 × 111 mm); Americký motocykl (7 × 4 palce); Standard USA/Kanady (12 × 6 palců); Jiné
it: Standard di taglia della targa identificativa del veicolo: Standard Australia (372 x 134 mm); Standard UE (520 x 110 mm); Standard Giappone (330 x 165 mm); Altro/Universale; Standard Regno Unito (520 x 111 mm); Moto USA (7 x 4 pollici); Standard USA/Canada (12 x 6 pollici); Altro
th: ขนาดมาตรฐานป้ายทะเบียนรถยนต์: มาตรฐานออสเตรเลีย (372 x 134 มม.); มาตรฐาน EU (520 x 110 มม.); มาตรฐานญี่ปุ่น (330 x 165 มม.); อื่นๆ/อเนกประสงค์; มาตรฐาน UK (520 x 111 มม.); มอเตอร์ไซค์ของสหรัฐอเมริกา (7 x 4 นิ้ว); มาตรฐานสหรัฐอเมริกา/แคนาดา (12 x 6 นิ้ว); อื่นๆ
sv: Standardstorlek för registreringsskyltar: Australisk standard (372 x 134 mm); EU-standard (520 x 110 mm); Japansk standard (330 x 165 mm); Övrigt/universell; Brittisk standard (520 x 111 mm); USA motorcykel (7 x 4 tum); USA/Kanada standard (12 x 6 tum); Övrigt